District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-305.02

Minimum funding for Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization’s capital budgets to be included in budget and financial plan.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 301(b), 53 DCR 2843
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 4042(b)(2), 54 DCR 7052
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 7061, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 7012(a)(2), 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4042(b)(2) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7011 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7061 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7061 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 7012(a)(2) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

Short Title

Short title: Section 7060 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle D of title VII of the act may be cited as the “School Modernization Financing Amendment Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 7011 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle B of title VII of the act may be cited as “Prior Fiscal Year Conforming Budget Amendments Act of 2011”.